Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
Article 4 Seed Arbitration Council

Administrative rules and regulations.

Seed arbitration, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Agriculture, Seed Division, Subject 40-12-6.

2-11-70.
Purpose; creation of Seed Arbitration Council.

The intent and purpose of this article are to provide a method for assisting farmers, persons purchasing seed and commercial fruit and nut trees, and persons selling seed and commercial fruit and nut trees in determining the validity of complaints of seed and commercial fruit and nut trees purchasers against seed and commercial fruit and nut tree sellers relating to the quality and performance of the seed and the identity of the variety of fruit and nut trees by establishing a committee to investigate, hold informal hearings, make findings, and render recommendations in the nature of arbitration proceedings where damages suffered by seed and commercial fruit and nut trees purchasers are caused by the alleged failure of the seed to perform as represented or to conform to the description on the labeling thereof as required by law or to be the variety of fruit or nut tree represented by the seller.

In order to effectuate the intent and purpose set out in subsection (a) of this Code section, there is created the “Seed Arbitration Council.”

History.

Code 1981, §

2-11-70

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1761, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1151, § 3.

2-11-71.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture or the designated official or department employed by the Department of Agriculture of this state.

“Council” means the Seed Arbitration Council.

“Person” means an individual, firm, partnership, corporation, or company.

“Purchaser” means the person who buys agricultural, flower, tree, shrub, or vegetable seed subject to Article 2 of this chapter or any commercial fruit or nut tree.

“Seller” means any person who sells seed, including but not limited to the person who sold the seed to the purchaser and the person who actually labeled the seed that is the subject of the council’s investigation and any person who sells commercial fruit or nut trees.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-11-71

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1761, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1151, § 3.

2-11-72.
Notice of requirements for filing complaint printed on seed container, label, or invoice; effect of failure to provide notice.

At the time of purchase of agricultural, vegetable, flower, tree, or shrub seed, except for vegetable and flower seed in packets weighing less than one pound for use in home gardens or household plantings or at the time of purchase of any commercial fruit or nut tree, language setting forth the requirement for filing a complaint shall be legibly typed or printed on the seed container, on the label affixed thereto, or printed on the invoice covering bulk seed or on a label attached to or on the invoice covering the commercial fruit or nut tree.

Such language shall be in addition to the labeling requirements specified in Code Section 2-11-22 and shall contain a notice in a form acceptable in interstate trade as prescribed by rule and regulation promulgated by the Commissioner.

If language setting forth the requirement is not so placed on the seed container, label, or invoice covering bulk seed or on a label or invoice covering the commercial fruit or nut tree, the filing of a complaint by the buyer shall not be required as a prerequisite to maintaining a legal action against the seller as provided in Code Section 2-11-73.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-11-72

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1761, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1151, § 3.

2-11-73.
Filing complaint; fee; procedure.

When any farmer or seed purchaser alleges to have been damaged by the failure of any agricultural, flower, tree, shrub, or vegetable seed, except for vegetable and flower seed in packets weighing less than one pound for use in home gardens or household plantings, to conform to or perform as represented by the label required to be attached to such seed under Code Section 2-11-22 or by warranty or as a result of negligence, as a prerequisite to the purchaser’s right to maintain a legal action against the seller, the purchaser shall submit a complaint against the seller alleging the damages sustained or to be sustained and shall file such complaint with the Commissioner in time for the seed, crop, or plants to be inspected to determine if the alleged deficiencies warrant arbitration. Whenever any farmer or commercial fruit or nut tree purchaser alleges to have been damaged by the failure of any commercial fruit or nut tree to be the variety represented by the label or invoice or by warranty or as the result of negligence, as a prerequisite to the purchaser’s right to maintain a legal action against the seller, the purchaser shall submit a complaint against the seller alleging the damages sustained or to be sustained and shall file such complaint with the Commissioner in time for the trees to be inspected to determine if the alleged deficiencies warrant arbitration. Upon receipt, the Commissioner shall send a copy of the complaint to the seller by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery.

A filing fee of $75.00 shall be paid to the Commissioner with each complaint filed. Such fee shall be recovered from the seller upon recommendation of the Seed Arbitration Council. The filing fee shall be forfeited if the complaint is independently settled between the purchaser and seller prior to the informal hearing scheduled by the council. Such independent settlement serves to close the file on the complaint.

Within ten days after the receipt of a copy of the complaint, the seller shall file with the Commissioner a response to said complaint. Upon receipt, the Commissioner shall send a copy of the response to the purchaser by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery.

Upon gathering the complaint and the response, the Commissioner shall refer the complaint and the response to the Seed Arbitration Council as provided in Code Section 2-11-75 for investigation, informal hearing, findings, and recommendations on the complaint.

Upon receipt of findings and recommendations of the Seed Arbitration Council, the Commissioner shall transmit said items to the purchaser and seller by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery.

The purchaser and seller shall give written notice to the Commissioner of the acceptance or rejection of the council’s recommendations within 30 days of the date the decision is mailed to the purchaser and seller.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-11-73

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1761, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1151, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1129, § 2/SB 390.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

2-11-74.
Membership of Seed Arbitration Council; terms; chairperson and secretary; sessions; expenses.

The Seed Arbitration Council shall be composed of five members. One member and one alternate shall be appointed upon the recommendation of each of the following individuals or executive committee:

The associate dean for the Cooperative Extension Service of the University of Georgia;

The associate dean for the experiment stations of the College of Agricultural and Environmental Sciences of the University of Georgia;

The president of the Georgia Farm Bureau Federation;

The executive committee of the Georgia Seedsmen’s Association; and

The Commissioner of Agriculture.

Each member and each alternate shall continue to serve until a replacement has been recommended by his or her appointing official. Alternate members shall serve only in the absence of the member for whom such person is an alternate.

The council shall annually elect a chairperson and a secretary from its membership. The chairperson shall conduct the meetings and deliberations of the council and direct all activities. The secretary shall keep accurate records of all the meetings and deliberations and perform such other duties as the chairperson may direct.

The council may be called into session upon the direction of the chairperson or by the Commissioner to consider matters referred to it by the Commissioner.

Members of the council shall receive no compensation for the performance of their duties but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses by each representing organization.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-11-74

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1761, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1151, § 3.

2-11-75.
Hearings and investigations.

Upon receipt of a seed buyer complaint or a commercial fruit or nut tree buyer complaint and a seller response, the council shall schedule a hearing date within ten days and shall make a full and complete investigation of the matters stated in the complaint.

Hearings scheduled by the council shall be conducted in Tifton, Macon, Athens, or Rome, Georgia, whichever is most convenient to the farmer or other seed or commercial fruit or nut tree purchaser filing the complaint, such determination to be made by the chairperson.

The Commissioner shall provide administrative support for the council and shall adopt rules and regulations to govern investigations and hearings.

In conducting its investigation, the council, in addition to other activities deemed necessary, is authorized to:

Examine the purchaser on the use of the seed or commercial fruit or nut tree or trees about which the complaint is filed, the purchaser’s operation and the seller on the packaging and labeling, and the seller’s operations on the seed or commercial fruit or nut tree or trees alleged to be faulty or of a different variety;

Grow to production a representative sample of the alleged faulty seed through the facilities of the state and under the supervision of the Commissioner, as deemed necessary;

Hold informal hearings at a reasonable time as directed by the chairperson. At such hearing, the purchaser and seller shall be allowed to present their side of the dispute before the council. Attorneys may be present, provided that no attorney may participate directly in the proceeding; and

Seek evaluations from authorities in allied disciplines when deemed necessary.

Any investigation made by fewer than all of the councilmembers shall be by authority of a written directive by the chairperson, and such investigation shall be summarized in writing and considered by the council in reporting its findings and recommendations.

The Attorney General shall provide legal services for the council.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-11-75

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1761, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1151, § 3.

2-11-76.
Findings and recommendations.

After completion of the informal hearing by the council, a report of findings and recommendations shall be transmitted to parties present at the arbitration process pursuant to subsection (e) of Code Section 2-11-73. In such report, the council may make any recommendations it deems fair and equitable under the circumstances presented. These recommendations are up to the discretion of the council and may include, but are not limited to, the following:

That no action be taken;

That money damages be paid to the purchaser as a result of the alleged failure of the seed to conform to or perform as represented by the seed label, container, or invoice;

(2.1)

That money damages be paid to the purchaser of a commercial fruit or nut tree or trees as a result of the alleged failure of the tree or trees to be the variety represented to the purchaser. Such damages shall not be less than three times the purchase price in the case of fruit trees or six times the purchase price in the case of nut trees;

That the seller reimburse the purchaser for the amount of the filing fee paid to enter the arbitration process; or

Such other recommendation found by the council to be fair and equitable to the parties.

In any litigation involving a complaint which has been the subject of arbitration under this Code section, any party may introduce the report of arbitration as evidence of the facts found in the report as the court may see fit. Findings and conclusions of the council are not admissible as evidence. However, the court may take into account any determinations of the council with respect to the failure of any party to cooperate in the arbitration proceedings.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-11-76

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1761, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1151, § 3.

2-11-77.
Rules and regulations.

Pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” the Commissioner shall have authority to promulgate and enforce such rules and regulations as may be deemed necessary to carry out the provisions of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-11-77

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1761, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1151, § 3.